Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-747
Hearings; subject to review.

All hearings conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act shall be of record and available for review.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 1071, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-668;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 70;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.64;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 87.